Louisiana, session 2026, SB288.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:587(A)(1)(b) and (F)(1), 587.2(B), and 587.7(B)(3) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§587. Duty to provide information; processing fees; Louisiana Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information
A.(1) * * *
(b) The Louisiana State Board of Private Security Examiners shall be entitled
to the criminal history record and identification files of the bureau on those persons
seeking to be licensed or registered by the board as a means of performing
background checks on those individuals. In addition, in order to determine an
applicant's eligibility or suitability for licensure or registration under the provisions
of the Private Security Regulatory and Licensing Law, each applicant shall be
fingerprinted, and the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the bureau to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.
* * *
F.(1) An employer or his representative shall be entitled to obtain conviction
records of an applicant seeking employment, directly from the Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information in order to further qualify the applicant for the
position being sought, if the applicant has signed a consent form authorizing the
employer to obtain such conviction records. Upon written request and upon
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 288 ENROLLED
presentation of a consent form prepared by the bureau and executed by the applicant,
the bureau shall provide conviction records of the applicant to the employer or his
representative in a timely manner. In addition, each applicant shall be fingerprinted,
and the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the bureau to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history check or shall submit fingerprints to
the bureau. Records obtained pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection shall not
include those records which have been ordered expunged pursuant to R.S. 44:9. The
provisions of Subsection B of this Section shall apply to any request made pursuant
to this Subsection. The bureau shall not be liable civilly or criminally for the release
of information released pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection.
* * *
§587.2. Institutions of postsecondary education; criminal history information
* * *
B. When a criminal history records check is requested pursuant to Subsection
A of this Section, the institution of postsecondary education shall be provided with
state or and national criminal history record information, or both, from the Louisiana
Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information and from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation relative to the applicant prospective employee whose fingerprints have
been obtained by the institution pursuant to this Section. The Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information shall, upon request and after receipt of fingerprint
cards and other identifying information as required by the bureau from the
institution, make available to the institution all prior arrests for any sex offense,
aggravated offense, or any sexual offense against a victim who is a minor as defined
in R.S. 15:541 or any crime of violence as enumerated in R.S. 14:2(B) and
conviction information for any offense contained in the bureau's criminal history
record and identification files, which pertains to the applicant or prospective
employee, including convictions dismissed pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure
Article 893 or 894. In addition, when the institution of postsecondary education
requests such criminal history record information, the bureau shall forward the
fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 288 ENROLLED
check and make such conviction information available to the institution, which
pertains to the applicant or prospective employee.
* * *
§587.7. Volunteer and employee criminal history system
* * *
B. * * *
(3)(a) When a criminal history records check is requested by a qualified
entity pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the bureau shall provide the
qualified entity with the state criminal history record information of the individual
subject to the inquiry. In addition, when the qualified entity requests national
criminal history records checks, the bureau shall forward the fingerprints to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records check and
shall provide the qualified entity with the national criminal history record
information of the individual subject to the inquiry.
(b) The bureau may provide expunged criminal history record
information from the state's criminal history record repository to public
qualified entities at its discretion based upon strong evidence provided by the
public qualified entity that its possessing of the expunged information would be
in the best interest to protect the children, the elderly, or individuals with
disabilities, served by the public qualified entity. Private qualified entities shall
be prohibited from receiving expunged criminal history record information.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.